Georgia, session 2025_26, HB797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
8 SECTION 1.
9 Short title.
10 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Homelessness Prevention Act of Chatham
11 County."
H. B. 797
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
12 SECTION 2.
13 Findings.
14 It is found and determined that:
15 (1) Public and private agencies are less effective in responding to people experiencing
16 homelessness when programs are not coordinated and administered in a systematic
17 manner under a comprehensive plan;
18 (2) A continuum of care is a year-round planning body of representative stakeholders in
19 a community's work toward ending homelessness that coordinates the community's
20 policies, strategies, and activities toward ending homelessness. Continuums of care
21 gather and analyze information to determine the local needs of people experiencing
22 homelessness, implement strategic responses, and measure results. Continuums of care
23 set the local processes for applying, reviewing, and prioritizing project applications for
24 funding each year in the continuum of care program completion;
25 (3) The Chatham-Savannah Authority for the Homeless was created by the General
26 Assembly prior to the requirement under federal law that a continuum of care be
27 established for Chatham County;
28 (4) The stakeholders of Chatham County and the City of Savannah have created a
29 continuum of care and named that organization the Interagency Council on Homelessness
30 for Chatham-Savannah;
31 (5) There are four major functions of the Interagency Council on Homelessness for
32 Chatham-Savannah:
33 (A) Supporting the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
34 required operations of the continuum of care;
35 (B) Designing and supporting, or contracting for, the operations of a homeless
36 management information system for the continuum of care;
37 (C) Continuum of care planning; and
H. B. 797
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
38 (D) Supporting collaborative applicants in preparing and submitting applications for
39 funds in accordance with 24 C.F.R. Sections 578.7 and 578.9;
40 (6) The Interagency Council on Homelessness for Chatham-Savannah is established to
41 serve as the continuum of care board of directors for the purpose of facilitating
42 interagency and cross-sector coordination in planning, policymaking, program
43 development, system performance monitoring, budget planning, and coordination of
44 federal homeless assistance resources on behalf of the continuum of care;
45 (7) The Interagency Council on Homelessness for Chatham-Savannah has the
46 responsibility to comply with Housing and Urban Development requirements under 24
47 C.F.R. Part 578 in all matters, including guiding principles of membership and
48 participation;
49 (8) The Interagency Council on Homelessness for Chatham-Savannah must have a
50 collaborative applicant who manages and administers a homeless management
51 information system and administers a coordinated entry system, leads an annual point in
52 time count, and assists with the notice of funding opportunity process, including the
53 preparation and final submission of the community collaborative application. The
54 Chatham-Savannah Authority for the Homeless is the collaborative applicant; and
55 (9) The City of Savannah created an Interagency Council on Homelessness in 2023 that
56 presently has a board composed of ten governmental seats, three officers, and others.
57 SECTION 3.
58 Definitions.
59 As used in this Act, the following words and terms shall have the meaning specified unless
60 the context or use clearly indicates a different meaning or intent:
61 (1) "Board" means the board of directors of the Interagency Council on Homelessness
62 for Chatham-Savannah.
H. B. 797
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
63 (2) "Collaborative applicant" means the agency designated to meet all United States
64 Housing and Urban Development requirements under 24 C.F.R. Part 578.
65 (3) "Continuum of care" means the group of individuals and agencies that plan a
66 community's response to people experiencing homelessness.
67 (4) "Coordinated entry" means a systemwide process that coordinates the access,
68 assessment, and prioritization and referrals to housing and emergency services for people
69 experiencing, or at imminent risk of, homelessness.
70 (5) "Council" means the Interagency Council on Homelessness for Chatham-Savannah.
71 (6) "Homeless management information system" means the platform or software used
72 to collect jurisdictional data and report such data to the Department of Community
73 Affairs.
74 (7) "Notice of funding opportunity" means those notices provided to local governments
75 and communities by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
76 SECTION 4.
77 Interagency Council on Homelessness for Chatham-Savannah created.
78 There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the "Interagency Council on
79 Homelessness for Chatham-Savannah" which shall be deemed to be a public corporation.
80 Such corporation shall be separate and distinct from any public corporation or other entity
81 heretofore created by the General Assembly and shall be an instrumentality of the State of
82 Georgia exercising governmental and proprietary powers. The council is created for the
83 purpose of developing and adopting comprehensive plans for the continuum of care to deal
84 effectively with the problems of the homeless in Chatham County and Savannah; to
85 coordinate, evaluate, and provide administrative services and assistance in implementing and
86 carrying out such comprehensive plan; to provide uniform basic standards and practices for
87 organizations offering services to homeless individuals through a certification process,
H. B. 797
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
88 ensuring integrity and continuity of program delivery; to support the designated lead agency
89 in the operation and management of a homeless management information system for the
90 continuum of care; to support the collaborative applicant in the preparation and submission
91 of applications for funds in accordance with 24 C.F.R. Sections 578.7 and 578.9; and to
92 support the development, delivery, and implementation of a coordinated entry system across
93 all of Chatham County. In connection with the exercise of any of its powers, the members
94 of the council may make findings or determinations that the exercise of its powers will
95 support the purposes for which the council is created.
96 SECTION 5.
97 Board of directors.
98 (a) The council shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of 21 members.
99 (b) The board of directors shall consist of:
100 (1) The city manager for the City of Savannah;
101 (2) The county manager for Chatham County;
102 (3) The executive director of the Chatham Area Transit Authority;
103 (4) The executive director of the Housing Authority of Savannah;
104 (5) Nine members appointed by the chairperson of the council or by a majority vote of
105 the city manager for the City of Savannah, the county manager for Chatham County, the
106 executive director of the Chatham Area Transit Authority, and the executive director of
107 the Housing Authority of Savannah from the following organizations:
108 (A) The manager or mayor of any municipality in Chatham County;
109 (B) The Department of Corrections;
110 (C) The Savannah-Chatham County Public School System;
111 (D) The Chatham Emergency Management Agency;
112 (E) The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities;
H. B. 797
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
113 (F) The Department of Community Supervision;
114 (G) The Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human
115 Services;
116 (H) The Department of Labor;
117 (I) The Department of Public Health;
118 (J) The Department of Veterans Affairs; or
119 (K) The Department of Community Affairs;
120 (6) The chairperson of the Chatham-Savannah Authority for the Homeless;
121 (7) Six members of the general public appointed by a majority vote of the council, two
122 of whom shall be:
123 (A) A person who is homeless or has experienced homelessness; and
124 (B) A member of the Savannah Chamber of Commerce; and
125 (8) The executive director of the Chatham-Savannah Authority for the Homeless as an
126 ex officio member.
127 (c) Appointed members of the council shall serve three-year terms. Members appointed
128 to fill a vacancy shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term. No member appointed
129 to the council shall serve more than two consecutive complete terms. A member becomes
130 eligible to serve again one year after his or her second consecutive complete term ended.
131 (d) The board shall elect a chairperson and establish bylaws that elect officers, set election
132 dates, outline nomination processes, and sets forth the rules and regulations of the council.
133 Once approved by the board, the bylaws shall be voted on by the general membership of
134 the council.
135 (e) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.
H. B. 797
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
136 SECTION 6.
137 General membership.
138 In addition to the board, there shall be general membership in the council. General
139 membership is open to anyone working or living in Chatham County. The general members
140 shall be broadly representative of public and private homeless service sectors, including, but
141 not limited to, homeless clients and consumer interests. General membership meetings shall
142 be held in accordance with duly adopted bylaws and comply with United States Department
143 of Urban Development rules and regulations.
144 SECTION 7.
145 Powers and duties.
146 The council shall have the following powers and duties:
147 (1) To have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;
148 (2) To contract for services necessary to carry out its mission;
149 (3) To adopt and alter its own bylaws;
150 (4) To receive and utilize gifts, donations, and contributions of money and property and
151 services if necessary to carry out its mission;
152 (5) To exercise the powers conferred upon a "public corporation" by Article IX, Section
153 III, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia, such corporation being expressly declared
154 to be a public corporation within the meaning of such provision of the Constitution of
155 Georgia;
156 (6) To appoint, select, and employ, with or without bidding as the council may choose,
157 officers, agents, and employees;
158 (7) To acquire, construct, purchase, hold, own, lease as lessee, expand, improve,
159 renovate, repair, maintain, and operate real and personal property or interests therein;
H. B. 797
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
160 (8) To sell, lease as lessor, or otherwise transfer, pledge, or dispose of any real and
161 personal property interests therein. In connection with any such lease, sale, transfer
162 assignment, or other disposition, the council need not comply with any other provision
163 of law requiring public bidding or notice to the public of such lease, sale, transfer,
164 assignment, or other disposition;
165 (9) To acquire projects and other property in its own name by gift or by purchase on such
166 terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper. If the council shall
167 deem it expedient to construct any project on real property or any interest therein or
168 usufruct therein which is subject to the control of any other public body, then such other
169 public body is hereby authorized to convey or lease such real property or interest therein
170 to the council for no consideration or for such consideration as may be agreed upon by
171 the council and such other public body, taking into consideration the public benefit to be
172 derived from such conveyance, lease, or usufruct. Any public body may transfer such
173 real property or interest therein without regard to any determination as to whether or not
174 such property or interest therein is surplus;
175 (10) To make and execute with one or more public bodies and private persons contracts,
176 lease agreements, rental agreements, installment sale agreements, and other instruments
177 relating to the property of the council and incident to the exercise of the powers of the
178 council, including contracts for constructing, renting, leasing, and selling its projects for
179 the benefit of other public bodies and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing,
180 authority is specifically granted to the council and to other public bodies to enter into
181 contracts, lease agreements, rental agreements, installment sale agreements, and related
182 agreements with each other relating to the provision of any project or services for a term
183 not exceeding 50 years, as provided in Article IX, Section III, Paragraph I(a) of the
184 Constitution of Georgia;
185 (11) To be a co-owner, along with other public bodies, or to the extent allowed by the
186 Constitution of the state, private persons of any property, if the council finds and
H. B. 797
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
187 determines that such co-ownership is in the best interests of the council and will serve the
188 public purposes of the council;
189 (12) To purchase policies of insurance as may be deemed appropriate for its corporate
190 purposes;
191 (13) To operate, lease, sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of any property, real or
192 personal, or assets of the council, or to assign its rights under its contracts, lease
193 agreements, or installment sale agreements or its right to receive payments thereunder,
194 either directly or through trust or custodial arrangements whereby interests are created
195 in such contracts, lease agreements, or installment sale agreements or the payments to be
196 received thereunder through the issuance of trust certificates, certificates of participation,
197 custodial receipts, or other similar instruments. In connection with any such lease, sale,
198 transfer, assignment, or other disposition, the council need not comply with any other
199 provision of law requiring public bidding or any notice to the public of such lease, sale,
200 transfer, assignment, or other disposition;
201 (14) To accept loans and grants of money or property of any kind from the United States
202 or any public body or private person, and all public bodies are authorized to make grants
203 to the council, subject to any limitations in the Constitution of Georgia;
204 (15) To make such rules and regulations governing its employees and property as it may
205 in its discretion deem proper;
206 (16) To be sued the same as any private corporation on any contractual obligation of the
207 council. The council shall have the same rights to sue any other person or entity as any
208 private corporation; and
209 (17) To have and exercise the usual powers of private corporations, except such as are
210 inconsistent with this Act, and to do any and all things necessary and convenient to
211 accomplish the purposes and powers of the council as stated in this Act.
H. B. 797
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
212 SECTION 8.
213 The board as trustees.
214 The board shall be held accountable in all respects as trustees. The council or its fiscal agent
215 shall keep suitable records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind. There
216 shall be an independent audit of the council if the council received or spent money in a
217 taxable year without the use of a fiscal agent.
218 SECTION 9.
219 Charitable and public functions.
220 The creation of the council and the carrying out of its corporate purposes is in all respects for
221 the benefit of the people of the state. The council is an institution of purely public charity
222 and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power
223 conferred upon it by this Act. The council shall not be required to pay any taxes or
224 assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it or under its jurisdiction,
225 control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or any rates, fees,
226 tolls, or other charges for the use of such projects or other income received by the council.
227 SECTION 10.
228 Actions.
229 Any action brought against the council shall be brought in the Superior Court of Chatham
230 County and such court shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such question.
H. B. 797
- 10 -

25 LC 62 0142/AP
231 SECTION 11.
232 Liberal construction.
233 Being for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, this Act shall be liberally construed to
234 effect the purposes of the Act.
235 SECTION 12.
236 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 797
- 11 -